New Jersey, session 221, A1728.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  In addition to any State aid received pursuant to P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et seq.) or any other law, a school district in a municipality which has a population composed of more than 51% senior citizens age 65 or older according to the most recent federal decennial census shall receive senior citizen supplemental stabilization aid.  Except as otherwise provided pursuant to subsection b. of this section, a qualifying school district shall receive aid equal to $500 multiplied by the districts projected resident enrollment for the budget year. b.    In the event that a municipality that meets the criteria established in subsection a. of this section is a constituent municipality of a regional school district, the additional aid for the regional school district shall be calculated by multiplying the number of students who reside in the constituent municipality projected to enroll in the regional school district in the budget year by $500.  The share of the school tax levy for the regional school district attributable to the qualifying constituent municipality calculated pursuant to N.J.S. 18A:13-23 shall be reduced by the amount of senior citizen supplemental stabilization aid received pursuant this section. c.     Notwithstanding the provisions of section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the aid awarded pursuant to the provisions of subsections a. and b. of this section shall not be adjusted based on the school districts actual resident enrollment in the budget year. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply in the 2008-2009 school year.